Vermont, session 2025-2026, H598.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 201 is amended to read:
§ 201. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(9) “Portable solar energy generation device” means a movable
photovoltaic generation device that:
(A) has a maximum power output to the electric grid of not more
than 1,200 watts;
VT LEG #385163 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.598
2026 Page 2 of 3
(B) is designed to be connected to a building’s electrical system via
an electrical cord plugged into a receptacle;
(C) is intended primarily to offset part of the customer’s electricity
consumption;
(D) includes a feature that prevents the system from energizing the
building’s electrical system during a power outage;
(E) is certified by Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent
Nationally Recognized Testing Laboratory for use in the United States; and
(F) is connected to a building that is connected to the electric grid.
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 256 is added to read:
§ 256. PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATION DEVICES
(a) The installation of a portable solar energy generation device shall not be
required to comply with the requirements of section 248 of this chapter or be
required to obtain an interconnection agreement with an electric distribution
company.
(b) On or before September 10, 2026, the Public Utility Commission, in
consultation with the Division of Fire Safety and the electric distribution
companies, shall develop a simple notification form for customers who install
portable solar energy devices, which shall, at a minimum, include the name of
the customer and contact information, the address of installation, the
customer’s electric utility, and the meter number. The form shall be available
VT LEG #385163 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.598
2026 Page 3 of 3
in an online version and a printable version. An electric distribution company
may require customers to submit the notification form to the company after
installation of the device.
(c) An electric distribution company shall not require a customer using a
portable solar energy generation device to:
(1) obtain the company’s approval before installing or using the device;
(2) pay any fee or charge related to the device; or
(3) install any additional controls or equipment beyond what is
integrated into the device.
(d) A portable solar energy generation device shall not be eligible for net
metering.
(e) A portable solar energy device in a public building, as defined in 20
V.S.A. § 2730, shall be used in a manner that complies with all applicable
requirements of the most recent Fire and Building Safety Code adopted by the
Division of Fire Safety.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385163 v.1